Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Article 9. Mississippi Statewide Library Development System Act of 1988.

§ 39-3-351.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Statewide Library Development System Act of 1988.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 589, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 39-3-353.
Definitions.

For purposes of this article:

“Administrative board” shall mean that board of trustees within a public library system designated pursuant to Section 39-3-13(4), Mississippi Code of 1972, with the administrative responsibilities prescribed under Section 39-3-17, Mississippi Code of 1972.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Library Commission established under Section 39-3-101, Mississippi Code of 1972.

“Cooperative” means any joint effort by two (2) or more library systems to improve library service.

“Development system” means the statewide library development system, a network of public and nonpublic libraries cooperating in communities, districts and statewide to provide better library service.

“Public library” means a library which provides customary services, without charge, to all the residents of a county, city or region and is supported whole or in part by public funds.

“Public library system” means an affiliation of one or more public libraries that (i) is a minimum of one (1) county unit; (ii) has one (1) library administrative board of trustees; (iii) has one (1) library system director; (iv) is established according to Section 39-3-8, 39-3-9, 39-3-11 or 39-3-13, Mississippi Code of 1972; and (v) is supported whole or in part by public funds.

“Nonpublic library” means a school, college or university, medical, business, law or other special library.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 589, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 39-3-355.
Committee to develop system of public service incentives within public library accreditation program.

The Mississippi Library Commission shall be responsible for developing a system of public service incentives within a public library accreditation program on the recommendation of a committee of qualified public library professionals and trustees. The committee of fifteen (15) members shall be appointed by the Mississippi Library Commission Board of Commissioners as follows: seven (7) public library trustees with at least one (1) from each congressional district; five (5) professional public librarians, one (1) appointed by each commissioner; and three (3) at-large members.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 589, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 39-3-357.
State aid to accredited public library systems.

Each accredited public library system shall receive an annual allocation of state funds to supplement the local appropriation and other income. Library cooperatives which include accredited public library systems may receive state aid. The state aid shall be used only to support library services in accredited public library systems and in cooperatives including accredited public library systems. The amount of the minimum allocation for each public library system shall be based on specific local service levels of the public library system and as identified by accreditation category.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 589, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 39-3-359.
Library commission as primary resource library; commission to provide services to libraries.

The commission shall be the primary resource library for Mississippi public libraries and shall develop its collection accordingly. The commission shall provide services to libraries within the funds available and in keeping with the goal of efficient use of library resources in the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 589, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 39-3-361.
Authorization to employ consultants and other staff.

The commission may employ consultants and other staff to implement the development system by working with cooperatives and public library systems.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 589, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 39-3-363.
Development of statewide master plan for public libraries.

The commission shall develop a statewide master plan for public libraries, including plans for levels of library services and resources, which is developed through a continuing process of planning. The master plan must be designed to extend five (5) years into the future and must be made current at least every two (2) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 589, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 39-3-365.
Confidentiality of library user records.

Records maintained by any library funded in whole or in part by public funds, which contain information relating to the identity of a library user, relative to the user’s use of books or other materials at the library, shall be confidential. Such records may only be released with the express written permission of the respective library user or as the result of a court order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 521, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 39-3-367.
Release and use of aggregate statistics.

Aggregate statistics shown from registration and circulation records, with all personal identification removed, may be released or used by a library for research, planning and reporting purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 521, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 39-3-369.
Use of records for purpose of collecting overdue materials and fines.

No provision of this article shall be construed to prohibit any library, or any business operating jointly with a library, from disclosing information for the purpose of collecting overdue books, documents, films or other items or materials owned or otherwise belonging to such library. No provision of this article shall be construed to prohibit or hinder any such library or business office from collecting fines on such overdue books, documents, films or other items or materials.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 521, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1992.